Washington statutes.
RCW 23B.01.240

Correcting filed documents.

A domestic or foreign corporation may correct a document filed by the secretary of state in accordance with RCW 23.95.220.

[ 2020 c 57 s 36; 2015 c 176 s 2104; 2002 c 297 s 5; 1989 c 165 s 7.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Contingent effective date—2015 c 176: See note following RCW 23.95.100.